Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Unified and Integrated Prosecutor System
15.755.
Compensation of Commonwealth’s attorney and staff — Monthly expense allowance — Compensation adjusted — Private law practice regulated.

The compensation of each Commonwealth’s attorney shall be paid out of the State Treasury.

The compensation of the staff of each Commonwealth’s attorney shall be paid out of the State Treasury.

In each judicial circuit containing a consolidated local government, a city with a population equal to or greater than twenty-five thousand (25,000) based on the most recent federal decennial census, or an urban-county government, or a city with a population equal to or greater than eight thousand (8,000) but less than twenty thousand (20,000) based on the most recent federal decennial census and a population of sixty-eight thousand (68,000) or more, or which has a full-time Commonwealth’s attorney, the Commonwealth’s attorney shall not engage in the private practice of law. The population of a judicial circuit shall, for the purpose of this statute, be determined by the most recent federal decennial census enumeration. All other Commonwealth’s attorneys shall not be prohibited from engaging in the private practice of law.

Each Commonwealth’s attorney who is prohibited from engaging in the private practice of law shall receive as compensation for his services the sum of twenty-six thousand dollars ($26,000) per annum.

Each Commonwealth’s attorney who is not prohibited from engaging in the private practice of law shall receive as compensation for his services the sum of fourteen thousand three hundred dollars ($14,300) per annum.

Each full-time Commonwealth’s attorney of the state shall be paid each month the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000) and each part-time Commonwealth’s attorney shall be paid each month the sum of five hundred dollars ($500), which sums are declared to be the equivalent of the minimum sums that each Commonwealth’s attorney will expend each month in the performance of his official duties directed to be performed for the Commonwealth. The aforementioned sum shall be paid out of the State Treasury.

In order to equate the compensation of Commonwealth’s attorneys with the purchasing power of the dollar, the Department for Local Government shall compute by the second Friday in February of every year the annual increase or decrease in the consumer price index of the preceding year by using 1949 as the base year in accordance with Section 246 of the Constitution of Kentucky which provides that the above elected officials shall be paid at a rate no greater than twelve thousand dollars ($12,000) per annum. The Department for Local Government shall notify the appropriate governing bodies charged by law to fix the compensation of the above elected officials of the annual rate of compensation to which the elected officials are entitled in accordance with the increase or decrease in the consumer price index. Upon notification from the Department for Local Government, the appropriate governing body may set the annual compensation of the above elected officials at a rate no greater than that stipulated by the Department for Local Government.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 17, § 12; 1978, ch. 384, § 580, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 480, § 1, effective January 1, 1988; 1992, ch. 220, § 1, effective January 1, 1994; 1994, ch. 508, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 175, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 69, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 182, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 47, § 8, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 16, effective July 15, 2010; 2014, ch. 92, § 22, effective January 1, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

Acts 1986, ch. 480, § 2 provides: “This Act shall take effect January 1, 1988. Provided, however, that KRS

15.755

[Section 1 of this Act] shall not apply to any Commonwealth’s attorney in office on July 15, 1986 or his successor unless such Commonwealth’s attorney shall notify the Attorney General in writing prior to December 15, 1987, of his intention to serve as a full-time Commonwealth’s attorney commencing on January 1, 1988.”

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 19, (4) at 1644.

15.757.
Procedure for voluntarily changing status from part-time to full-time Commonwealth’s attorney.

Any part-time Commonwealth’s attorney may voluntarily become a full-time Commonwealth’s attorney effective January 1, 1997, or at the beginning of any subsequent budget cycle by:

Not engaging in the private practice of law after the time he becomes a full-time Commonwealth’s attorney; and

By giving written notice to the Prosecutors Advisory Council not less than ninety (90) days prior to the beginning of the budget cycle at which he is to become a full-time Commonwealth’s attorney, of his intention to do so.

The Prosecutors Advisory Council shall review all requests from part-time Commonwealth’s attorneys and shall approve such requests based on available funds, population, caseload data, and other relevant information.

A circuit which has been authorized to have a full-time Commonwealth’s attorney shall not revert to part-time status for that position.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 175, § 2, effective July 15, 1996.

15.760.
Staff of Commonwealth’s attorneys — County’s duty to provide grand jury and witness rooms — Victim advocate.

Each Commonwealth’s attorney shall, during the calendar year 1977 and through June 30, 1978, be entitled to at least the number of assistant Commonwealth’s attorney positions, stenographic, secretarial, and clerical staff positions, and investigative and other personnel positions, which he had or was entitled to at the number and salary level in effect on December 1, 1976.

The number of assistant Commonwealth’s attorney positions, stenographic, secretarial, and clerical staff positions, and investigative and other personnel positions, shall be based on real need to be determined with the advice and consent of the Prosecutors Advisory Council.

All assistant Commonwealth’s attorneys shall be licensed practicing attorneys. The full-time assistant Commonwealth’s attorneys shall not be allowed to engage in the private practice of law.

All salaries paid to personnel appointed hereunder shall be paid from the State Treasury. The salaries shall be commensurate with the appointee’s education, experience, training, and responsibility, and be based upon the guidelines established by the Prosecutors Advisory Council, which guidelines shall be comparable with the classification and compensation plan for comparable positions maintained by the state Personnel Cabinet, pursuant to KRS

64.640

.

The fiscal court, consolidated local government, or urban-county government in the county or counties that comprise the judicial circuit shall be responsible for providing the office of the Commonwealth’s attorney with an adequate grand jury room and witness rooms.

Each Commonwealth’s attorney shall be authorized to employ individually or jointly with one (1) or more other Commonwealth’s attorneys at least one (1) victim advocate to counsel and assist crime victims as defined in KRS

421.500

.

An individual employed as a victim advocate shall be a person who by a combination of education, professional qualification, training, and experience is qualified to perform the duties of this position. The victim advocate shall be an individual at least eighteen (18) years of age, of good moral character, with at least two (2) years of experience working in the human services field or court system in a position requiring professional contact with children or adults, who has:

Received a baccalaureate degree in social work, sociology, psychology, guidance and counseling, education, religion, criminal justice, or other human service field; or

Received a high school diploma or equivalency certificate, and, in addition to the experience required in this subsection, has at least four (4) years’ experience working in the human services field or court system.

Each Commonwealth’s attorney who employs an individual to serve as a victim advocate shall develop a written job description which describes the duties of the position and shall ensure the victim advocate completes training relating to the appropriate intervention with crime victims, including victims of domestic violence and victims of elder abuse, neglect, or exploitation or other crimes against the elderly. Each victim advocate shall perform those duties necessary to insure compliance with the crime victim’s bill of rights contained in KRS

421.500

to

421.530

. No victim advocate shall engage in political activities while in the course of performing his duties as victim advocate or the practice of law as defined in KRS

524.130

. The creation and funding of any new personnel position shall be reviewed and approved by the Prosecutors Advisory Council.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 17, § 13; 1994, ch. 264, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 189, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 154, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 346, § 7, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 132, § 12, effective June 20, 2005.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Through June 30, 1978, only those Commonwealth’s attorneys in counties containing a first or second-class city are entitled to a secretary and after such date the number of secretaries for any of the Commonwealth’s attorneys will be determined with the advice and consent of the Prosecutors Advisory Council.

OAG 77-234

.

The Prosecutors Advisory Council has authority under this section to authorize assistant Commonwealth’s attorneys and detectives in any judicial district which needs additional personnel, and the compensation could be made retroactive to January of the year of the appointments.

OAG 77-432

.

The compensation of a grand jury reporter should be paid out of the State Treasury under proper budgetary procedure.

OAG 78-27

.

An assistant Commonwealth’s attorney is not required to be a resident of the judicial district in which his Commonwealth’s attorney was elected.

OAG 78-779

.

The state Personnel Board could select an assistant Commonwealth’s attorney to serve as general counsel and hearing officer for the board without first seeking competitive bidding for the professional services; further, such employment would not involve the attorney in a conflict of interest nor incompatibility of offices.

OAG 83-138

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Advisory Opinions, Vol. 46, No. 3, July, 1982, Ky. Bench & Bar 44.

15.765.
Salary of county attorney — Expense allowance — Compensation adjustment — Private practice of law permitted.

Each county attorney shall receive for prosecutorial duties an annual salary to be paid out of the State Treasury which shall be the total compensation as county attorney which he received during the calendar year 1976, but which in no event shall be less than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000); except, however, the annual salary of each county attorney shall be equal to that of each Commonwealth’s attorney who is not prohibited from the private practice of law as provided in KRS 15.755(5), effective January 1, 1990.

Each county attorney shall be paid each month the sum of five hundred dollars ($500), which sum is declared to be the equivalent of the minimum sum that each county attorney will expend each month in the performance of his official duties directed to be performed for the Commonwealth. The aforementioned sum shall be paid out of the State Treasury.

In order to equate the compensation of county attorneys with the purchasing power of the dollar, the Department for Local Government shall compute by the second Friday in February of every year the annual increase or decrease in the consumer price index of the preceding year by using 1949 as the base year in accordance with Section 246 of the Constitution of Kentucky which provides that the above elected officials shall be paid at a rate no greater than twelve thousand dollars ($12,000) per annum. The Department for Local Government shall notify the appropriate governing bodies charged by law to fix the compensation of the above elected officials of the annual rate of compensation to which the elected officials are entitled pursuant to the increase or decrease in the consumer price index. Upon notification from the Department for Local Government, the appropriate governing body may set the annual compensation of the above elected officials at a rate no greater than that stipulated by the Department for Local Government.

The county attorney shall not be prohibited from engaging in the private practice of law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 17, § 14, effective January 1, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 579, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 421, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 508, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 69, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 182, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 47, § 9, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 17, effective July 15, 2010.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 19, (5) at 1645.

15.770.
Assistant county attorneys, stenographers, secretaries, and other staff positions.

Each county attorney, with the approval of the Prosecutors Advisory Council, may appoint one (1) assistant county attorney for each District Judge in excess of one (1) in his judicial district unless prior approval is obtained from the Prosecutors Advisory Council for additional appointments; except no assistant county attorney may be appointed in multicounty judicial districts in which there are fewer District Judges than county attorneys unless prior approval is obtained from the Prosecutors Advisory Council for additional appointments.

The number of assistant county attorney positions, stenographic, secretarial and clerical positions and other personnel positions shall be based on real need to be determined with the advice and consent of the Prosecutors Advisory Council.

Assistant county attorneys shall not be prohibited from engaging in the private practice of law.

Any personnel appointed by the county attorney, under this section, who assist in the prosecutorial duties of District Court, shall be appointed for the duration of the unexpired part of the term of the county attorney, and subject to removal at the discretion of the county attorney.

All salaries paid to personnel appointed under this section shall be paid from the State Treasury to the extent such personnel assist in prosecutorial duties. Such salaries shall be commensurate with the appointee’s education, experience, training and responsibility, and be based upon the guidelines established by the Prosecutors Advisory Council, which guidelines shall be comparable with the classification and compensation plan for comparable positions maintained by the state Personnel Cabinet, pursuant to KRS

64.640

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 17, § 15, effective January 1, 1978; 1998, ch. 154, § 7, effective July 15, 1998.

15.775.
Educational programs on investigation and prosecution of crimes against the elderly.

The Prosecutors Advisory Council shall develop, in conjunction with the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, educational programs on the investigation and prosecution of abuse, neglect, and exploitation of the elderly and other crimes against the elderly.

A program not less than four (4) hours in length shall be made available to each Commonwealth’s attorney, county attorney, assistant Commonwealth’s attorney, assistant county attorney, Commonwealth’s detective, and county detective within six (6) months of the person’s initial taking of office or beginning of employment. Successful completion of the program shall be required for each officer specified, except for the elected Commonwealth’s attorney and county attorney. The program shall also include the use of a multidisciplinary team in the investigation of crimes specified in subsection (1) of this section.

Each assistant Commonwealth’s attorney, assistant county attorney, Commonwealth’s detective, and county detective shall successfully complete a two (2) hour update on the subjects specified in subsection (1) of this section at least once every five (5) years.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 132, § 10, effective June 20, 2005.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/20/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11, 85, 95, 97, 98, 99, 123, and 181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in the 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.